lib/dict/pl_PL.aff
SFX e Y 25
SFX e   ±c        êkniêto   l±c
SFX e   0         zono      [il]ec
SFX e   c         ¿ono      rz[ey]c
SFX e   0         zono      ³uc
SFX e   æ         no        [^±ei¶uy¼]æ
SFX e   ±æ        êto       [dijl¿]±æ
SFX e   ±æ        iêto      [^sz]n±æ
SFX e   zn±æ      ¼niêto    zn±æ
SFX e   sn±æ      ¶niêto    sn±æ
SFX e   eæ        ano       cieæ
SFX e   leæ       ielono    leæ
SFX e   eæ        ano       rzeæ
SFX e   eæ        ano       [^csz]ieæ
SFX e   eæ        ano       sieæ
SFX e   eæ        ano       zieæ
SFX e   æ         to        [^ac]iæ
SFX e   iæ        jono      [ae]iæ
SFX e   iæ        ono       ciæ
SFX e   ¶æ        siono     pa¶æ
SFX e   ±¶æ       êsiono    z±¶æ
SFX e   ¶æ        siono     nie¶æ
SFX e   ¶æ        dziono    wie¶æ
SFX e   ó¶æ       odzono    ó¶æ
SFX e   æ         to        [uy]æ
SFX e   ¼æ        ziono     ¼æ

SFX j Y 200
SFX j   ±c        êkniêcia  l±c
SFX j   ±c        êkniêcie  l±c
SFX j   ±c        êkniêciach l±c
SFX j   ±c        êkniêciami l±c
SFX j   ±c        êkniêciem l±c
SFX j   ±c        êkniêciom l±c
SFX j   ±c        êkniêciu  l±c
SFX j   ±c        êkniêæ    l±c
SFX j   0         zenia     [il]ec
SFX j   0         zenie     [il]ec
SFX j   0         zeniach   [il]ec
SFX j   0         zeniami   [il]ec
SFX j   0         zeniem    [il]ec
SFX j   0         zeniom    [il]ec
SFX j   0         zeniu     [il]ec
SFX j   0         zeñ       [il]ec
SFX j   c         ¿enia     rz[ey]c
SFX j   c         ¿enie     rz[ey]c
SFX j   c         ¿eniach   rz[ey]c
SFX j   c         ¿eniami   rz[ey]c
SFX j   c         ¿eniem    rz[ey]c
SFX j   c         ¿eniom    rz[ey]c
SFX j   c         ¿eniu     rz[ey]c
SFX j   c         ¿eñ       rz[ey]c
SFX j   0         zenia     ³uc
SFX j   0         zenie     ³uc
SFX j   0         zeniach   ³uc
SFX j   0         zeniami   ³uc
SFX j   0         zeniem    ³uc
SFX j   0         zeniom    ³uc
SFX j   0         zeniu     ³uc
SFX j   0         zeñ       ³uc
SFX j   æ         nia       [^±ei¶uy¼]æ
SFX j   æ         nie       [^±ei¶uy¼]æ
SFX j   æ         niem      [^±ei¶uy¼]æ
SFX j   æ         niu       [^±ei¶uy¼]æ
SFX j   æ         niami     [^±ei¶uy¼]æ
SFX j   æ         niom      [^±ei¶uy¼]æ
SFX j   æ         niach     [^±ei¶uy¼]æ
SFX j   æ         ñ         [^±ei¶uy¼]æ
SFX j   ±æ        êcia      [dijl¿]±æ
SFX j   ±æ        êcie      [dijl¿]±æ
SFX j   ±æ        êciem     [dijl¿]±æ
SFX j   ±æ        êciu      [dijl¿]±æ
SFX j   ±æ        êciami    [dijl¿]±æ
SFX j   ±æ        êciom     [dijl¿]±æ
SFX j   ±æ        êciach    [dijl¿]±æ
SFX j   ±æ        êæ        [dijl¿]±æ
SFX j   ±æ        iêcia     [^sz]n±æ
SFX j   ±æ        iêcie     [^sz]n±æ
SFX j   ±æ        iêciem    [^sz]n±æ
SFX j   ±æ        iêciu     [^sz]n±æ
SFX j   ±æ        iêciami   [^sz]n±æ
SFX j   ±æ        iêciom    [^sz]n±æ
SFX j   ±æ        iêciach   [^sz]n±æ
SFX j   ±æ        iêæ       [^sz]n±æ
SFX j   zn±æ      ¼niêcia   zn±æ
SFX j   zn±æ      ¼niêcie   zn±æ
SFX j   zn±æ      ¼niêciem  zn±æ
SFX j   zn±æ      ¼niêciu   zn±æ
SFX j   zn±æ      ¼niêciami zn±æ
SFX j   zn±æ      ¼niêciom  zn±æ
SFX j   zn±æ      ¼niêciach zn±æ
SFX j   zn±æ      ¼niêæ     zn±æ
SFX j   sn±æ      ¶niêcia   sn±æ
SFX j   sn±æ      ¶niêcie   sn±æ
SFX j   sn±æ      ¶niêciem  sn±æ
SFX j   sn±æ      ¶niêciu   sn±æ
SFX j   sn±æ      ¶niêciami sn±æ
SFX j   sn±æ      ¶niêciom  sn±æ
SFX j   sn±æ      ¶niêciach sn±æ
SFX j   sn±æ      ¶niêæ     sn±æ
SFX j   ieæ       enia      cieæ
SFX j   ieæ       enie      cieæ
SFX j   ieæ       eniem     cieæ
SFX j   ieæ       eniu      cieæ
SFX j   ieæ       eniami    cieæ
SFX j   ieæ       eniom     cieæ
SFX j   ieæ       eniach    cieæ
SFX j   ieæ       eñ        cieæ
SFX j   leæ       ielenia   leæ
SFX j   leæ       ielenie   leæ
SFX j   leæ       ieleniach leæ
SFX j   leæ       ieleniami leæ
SFX j   leæ       ieleniem  leæ
SFX j   leæ       ieleniom  leæ
SFX j   leæ       ieleniu   leæ
SFX j   leæ       ieleñ     leæ
SFX j   eæ        enia      rzeæ
SFX j   eæ        enie      rzeæ
SFX j   eæ        eniach    rzeæ
SFX j   eæ        eniami    rzeæ
SFX j   eæ        eniem     rzeæ
SFX j   eæ        eniom     rzeæ
SFX j   eæ        eniu      rzeæ
SFX j   eæ        eñ        rzeæ
SFX j   æ         nia       [^csz]ieæ
SFX j   æ         nie       [^csz]ieæ
SFX j   æ         niem      [^csz]ieæ
SFX j   æ         niu       [^csz]ieæ
SFX j   æ         niami     [^csz]ieæ
SFX j   æ         niom      [^csz]ieæ
SFX j   æ         niach     [^csz]ieæ
SFX j   æ         ñ         [^csz]ieæ
SFX j   ieæ       zenia     sieæ
SFX j   ieæ       zenie     sieæ
SFX j   ieæ       zeniem    sieæ
SFX j   ieæ       zeniu     sieæ
SFX j   ieæ       zeniami   sieæ
SFX j   ieæ       zeniom    sieæ
SFX j   ieæ       zeniach   sieæ
SFX j   ieæ       zeñ       sieæ
SFX j   ieæ       enia      zieæ
SFX j   ieæ       enie      zieæ
SFX j   ieæ       eniem     zieæ
SFX j   ieæ       eniu      zieæ
SFX j   ieæ       eniami    zieæ
SFX j   ieæ       eniom     zieæ
SFX j   ieæ       eniach    zieæ
SFX j   ieæ       eñ        zieæ
SFX j   æ         cia       [^ac]iæ
SFX j   æ         cie       [^ac]iæ
SFX j   æ         ciem      [^ac]iæ
SFX j   æ         ciu       [^ac]iæ
SFX j   æ         ciami     [^ac]iæ
SFX j   æ         ciom      [^ac]iæ
SFX j   æ         ciach     [^ac]iæ
SFX j   æ         æ         [^ac]iæ
SFX j   iæ        jenia     [ae]iæ
SFX j   iæ        jenie     [ae]iæ
SFX j   iæ        jeniem    [ae]iæ
SFX j   iæ        jeniu     [ae]iæ
SFX j   iæ        jeniami   [ae]iæ
SFX j   iæ        jeniom    [ae]iæ
SFX j   iæ        jeniach   [ae]iæ
SFX j   iæ        jeñ       [ae]iæ
SFX j   iæ        enia      ciæ
SFX j   iæ        enie      ciæ
SFX j   iæ        eniem     ciæ
SFX j   iæ        eniu      ciæ
SFX j   iæ        eniami    ciæ
SFX j   iæ        eniom     ciæ
SFX j   iæ        eniach    ciæ
SFX j   iæ        eñ        ciæ
SFX j   ¶æ        sienia    pa¶æ
SFX j   ¶æ        sienie    pa¶æ
SFX j   ¶æ        sieniem   pa¶æ
SFX j   ¶æ        sieniu    pa¶æ
SFX j   ¶æ        sieniami  pa¶æ
SFX j   ¶æ        sieniom   pa¶æ
SFX j   ¶æ        sieniach  pa¶æ
SFX j   ¶æ        sieñ      pa¶æ
SFX j   ±¶æ       êsienia   z±¶æ
SFX j   ±¶æ       êsienie   z±¶æ
SFX j   ±¶æ       êsieniem  z±¶æ
SFX j   ±¶æ       êsieniu   z±¶æ
SFX j   ±¶æ       êsieniami z±¶æ
SFX j   ±¶æ       êsieniom  z±¶æ
SFX j   ±¶æ       êsieniach z±¶æ
SFX j   ±¶æ       êsieñ     z±¶æ
SFX j   ¶æ        sienia    nie¶æ
SFX j   ¶æ        sienie    nie¶æ
SFX j   ¶æ        sieniem   nie¶æ
SFX j   ¶æ        sieniu    nie¶æ
SFX j   ¶æ        sieniami  nie¶æ
SFX j   ¶æ        sieniom   nie¶æ
SFX j   ¶æ        sieniach  nie¶æ
SFX j   ¶æ        sieñ      nie¶æ
SFX j   ¶æ        dzenia    wie¶æ
SFX j   ¶æ        dzenie    wie¶æ
SFX j   ¶æ        dzeniem   wie¶æ
SFX j   ¶æ        dzeniu    wie¶æ
SFX j   ¶æ        dzeniami  wie¶æ
SFX j   ¶æ        dzeniom   wie¶æ
SFX j   ¶æ        dzeniach  wie¶æ
SFX j   ¶æ        dzeñ      wie¶æ
SFX j   ó¶æ       odzenia   ó¶æ
SFX j   ó¶æ       odzenie   ó¶æ
SFX j   ó¶æ       odzeniem  ó¶æ
SFX j   ó¶æ       odzeniu   ó¶æ
SFX j   ó¶æ       odzeniami ó¶æ
SFX j   ó¶æ       odzeniom  ó¶æ
SFX j   ó¶æ       odzeniach ó¶æ
SFX j   ó¶æ       odzeñ     ó¶æ
SFX j   æ         cia       [uy]æ
SFX j   æ         cie       [uy]æ
SFX j   æ         ciem      [uy]æ
SFX j   æ         ciu       [uy]æ
SFX j   æ         ciami     [uy]æ
SFX j   æ         ciom      [uy]æ
SFX j   æ         ciach     [uy]æ
SFX j   æ         æ         [uy]æ
SFX j   ¼æ        zienia    ¼æ
SFX j   ¼æ        zienie    ¼æ
SFX j   ¼æ        zieniem   ¼æ
SFX j   ¼æ        zieniu    ¼æ
SFX j   ¼æ        zieniami  ¼æ
SFX j   ¼æ        zieniom   ¼æ
SFX j   ¼æ        zieniach  ¼æ
SFX j   ¼æ        zieñ      ¼æ

SFX m Y 53
SFX m   ba        eb        [^êo¶¼]ba
SFX m   êba       ±b        êba
SFX m   oba       ób        oba
SFX m   o¶ba      ó¶b       o¶ba
SFX m   o¼ba      ó¼b       o¼ba
SFX m   ca        iec       [^s]ca
SFX m   ca        ec        sca
SFX m   oda       ód        oda
SFX m   ga        eg        [^êor]ga
SFX m   êga       ±g        êga
SFX m   oga       óg        oga
SFX m   orga      órg       orga
SFX m   cia       æ         cia
SFX m   nia       ñ         [^djh¶t]nia
SFX m   nia       zieñ      dnia
SFX m   nia       en        [hj]nia
SFX m   ¶nia      sien      ¶nia
SFX m   nia       eñ        tnia
SFX m   sia       ¶         sia
SFX m   zia       ¼         zia
SFX m   oja       ój        oja
SFX m   ka        ek        [^æêo¶ñ¼]ka
SFX m   æka       ciek      æka
SFX m   êka       ±k        êka
SFX m   ñka       niek      ñka
SFX m   ¶ka       siek      ¶ka
SFX m   ¼ka       ziek      ¼ka
SFX m   la        el        [^o]la
SFX m   ola       ól        ola
SFX m   ³a        e³        [^ogk]³a
SFX m   ³a        ie³       [gk]³a
SFX m   o³a       ó³        o³a
SFX m   ma        em        [^æ]ma
SFX m   æma       ciem      æma
SFX m   na        en        [^mnow]na
SFX m   na        ien       [mnw]na
SFX m   opa       óp        opa
SFX m   ra        er        [^gkot]ra
SFX m   ra        ier       [gk]ra
SFX m   ora       ór        ora
SFX m   ra        er        astra
SFX m   ostra     óstr      ostra
SFX m   ota       ót        ota
SFX m   wa        ew        [^ko]wa
SFX m   wa        iew       kwa
SFX m   owa       ów        owa
SFX m   za        ez        [^dor]za
SFX m   oza       óz        oza
SFX m   odza      ódz       odza
SFX m   orza      órz       orza
SFX m   o¿a       ó¿        o¿a
SFX m   ¿a        e¿        [^ó]¿a
SFX m   ni        ñ         ni

SFX C Y 18
SFX C   ±c        êcy       ±c
SFX C   eæ        ci        [^i]eæ
SFX C   ieæ       ci        ieæ
SFX C   el        li        [^i]el
SFX C   iel       li        iel
SFX C   ól        oli       ól
SFX C   in        0         nin
SFX C   eñ        ni        [^i]eñ
SFX C   cieñ      tni       cieñ
SFX C   ieñ       ni        [pg]ieñ
SFX C   sieñ      ¶ni       sieñ
SFX C   zieñ      ni        dzieñ
SFX C   ±dz       êdzy      ni±dz
SFX C   ±dz       ê¿y       si±dz
SFX C   ±d¼       êdzi      ±d¼
SFX C   ó¼d¼      o¼dzi     ó¼d¼
SFX C   ±¿        ê¿y       ±¿
SFX C   ó¿        o¿y       ó¿

SFX n Y 5
SFX n   a         0         [^ij]a
SFX n   ja        yj        [^aeijoóuy]ja
SFX n   a         0         [aeijoóuy]ja
SFX n   ia        ij        [^drt]ia
SFX n   ia        yj        [drt]ia

SFX A Y 22
SFX A   iew       wie       [gk]iew
SFX A   ew        wie       [hnrt]ew
SFX A   a         e         a
SFX A   0         e         ni
SFX A   0         e         [cj]
SFX A   0         e         [^ó]l
SFX A   ól        ole       ól
SFX A   ¼         zie       [^±d]¼
SFX A   ¼         zie       [^±ó]d¼
SFX A   ±d¼       êdzie     ±d¼
SFX A   ód¼       odzie     ód¼
SFX A   ±¼        êzie      ±¼
SFX A   æ         cie       [^e]æ
SFX A   æ         cie       [^h³]eæ
SFX A   eæ        cie       [h³]eæ
SFX A   0         e         [^±]¿
SFX A   ±¿        ê¿e       ±¿
SFX A   ñ         nie       ñ
SFX A   ¶         sie       [ou]¶
SFX A   ¶         sie       [^w]ie¶
SFX A   ie¶       sie       wie¶
SFX A   0         e         z

SFX N Y 24
SFX N   0         om        [^aæño¶¼x]
SFX N   a         om        a
SFX N   æ         ciom      æ
SFX N   ñ         niom      ñ
SFX N   0         m         o
SFX N   ¶         siom      ¶
SFX N   x         ksom      x
SFX N   ¼         ziom      ¼
SFX N   0         ami       [^aæño¶¼x]
SFX N   0         mi        a
SFX N   æ         ciami     æ
SFX N   ñ         niami     ñ
SFX N   o         ami       o
SFX N   ¶         siami     ¶
SFX N   x         ksami     x
SFX N   ¼         ziami     ¼
SFX N   0         ach       [^aæño¶¼x]
SFX N   0         ch        a
SFX N   æ         ciach     æ
SFX N   o         ach       o
SFX N   ñ         niach     ñ
SFX N   ¶         siach     ¶
SFX N   x         ksach     x
SFX N   ¼         ziach     ¼
